Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1482
Violation; penalty.

Any person violating section 28-1481 shall be guilty of a Class IV felony.

Laws 1909, c. 90, § 69, p. 386;

R.S.1913, § 3967;

C.S.1922, § 3365;

C.S.1929, § 55-183;

R.S.1943, § 55-189;

Laws 1969, c. 459, § 75, p. 1605;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 54;

R.S.1943, (1984), § 55-177;

Laws 1986, LB 772, § 3.